Washington statutes.
RCW 29B.20.090

Certification of reports. (Effective January 1, 2026.)

Every report and statement required to be filed under this title shall identify the person preparing it, and shall be certified as complete and correct, both by the person preparing it and by the person on whose behalf it is filed.

[ 2024 c 164 s 415; 1973 c 1 s 43 (Initiative Measure No. 276, approved November 7, 1972). Formerly RCW 42.17A.145, 42.17.430.]

NOTES:

Intent—Construction—Rules remain valid—Effective date—2024 c 164: See notes following RCW 29B.10.010.

Effective date—Construction—1973 c 1: See notes following RCW 29B.05.010.